Illinois, session 104th, HB2496.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 5Section 4.7 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.7 new)7    Sec. 4.7. Application of changes in eligibility criteria 8for employees.9    (a) A rule adopted by the Department that adds an 10education or experience requirement to the eligibility 11criteria for a position does not apply to an employee who 12already holds that position at the time the requirement is 13added.14    (b) An individual seeking employment at the same position 15level but at a different facility shall remain eligible for 16employment in a position equivalent to the individual's 17current employment position despite any potential changes to 18eligibility criteria.  19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.